Connecticut, session 2026, SB00095.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
That chapter 229 of the general statutes be amended to establish a
credit against the personal income tax of five hundred dollars for
employees of defense contractors and of direct suppliers and
subcontractors of defense contractors, with adjusted gross income of
less than one hundred twenty-five thousand dollars for single filers and
less than two hundred fifty thousand dollars for married individuals
filing jointly.